Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.118.060

Rules.

The office of student financial assistance may adopt rules to implement this chapter.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 230; 2007 c 405 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.